District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-2029

Assessment of and limitations on deficiencies.

Repealed.

History

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 123, ch. 146, title I, § 149
July 24, 1982, D.C. Law 4-131, § 216, 29 DCR 2418
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(kk)(2), 48 DCR 334

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2029.
1973 Ed., § 47-2626.

Editor's Notes

Section 410(d) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(a), (c), (j), (m), (p), (q), (s), (w), (bb), (dd), (ee), (hh) through (kk), (mm) through (oo), (qq) through (uu), (yy), (zz), (bbb), (ddd), and (fff) shall apply for all tax years or taxable periods beginning after December 31, 2000.”